scribus/dicts/hyph_af.dic
wes5n
we4s3t
wes5w
3wet
5wet.
wets5o
wet4st
wets5ta
3wê1
w4h
w4i
wie3r
wie5ro
wi4g
wi4k
wik3o
3wild
wil4s
win4d3r
win4s
wins5k
wi4p
wi5pa
wip3r
wi5se
wit5i
wit5j
wit3o
wit3r
4wiu
2w3j
4wk
3wo
wo2l3a
woord5r
wor4s
5wort
wo3ru
4wos
4wot
5wr
w3t
5wu
wur4
wurm3
4ww
5wy.
3wyd
wy4do
4wy4g
wy3kw
5wys
wys5k
x3as
xbe4
3xe1
x4h
x5ha
3xia
x3im
x3io
x3o
x3s
xstra4
x3t
4y.
y1a
y4a4l
4yd
yden4
yd3oo
yd3op
yd3re
y4d3ro
yd3ru
yd3sl
yds5o
y1e
3y2enn
y2f3a
yf3ei
yf3in
yf3l
y4f3o
yf5r
y4fu
y3g2l
yg4st
yg5ste
4yi
y3in
y3is
y3j
y3ka
y3ki
y5king
yk3ins
y2k3l
yk3na
y1ko
y2k3op
y4kor
yk3r
yk4sa
yk3sn
yk5s4p
yks5w
yk3w
y3la
y1le
yl3f
y5li
y3lo
yl4sl
y3ly
yma4
y5mak
ymas3
y4mu
ym3ui
4yn
y2n3a
yn3g4
yngelowi5
yn3k4
yn3o
yn3sl
yn5st
yn3u
y3op
y3or
y4par
yp3arm
y3pl
y5pla
yp3li
yp3o
y3pr
y3r
ys3ap
y4s3em
ys3ind
ys4k
ys5kl
ys5kon
ys3ly
ys3n
ys5na
y2s3o
ys3po
ys3t
ys4ta
y4ste
y5stee
y5stel
y5stem
ys5terh
ys4to
ys4tr
4y4su
ys3w
yswa4
y3swee
y3ta
y3tj
y3to
yt3ra
yt3ri
yt3s
y3tu
yt5w
y3ui
y3y
3z
4z.
ze3r
5zi
5zo
4zz
